Idaho, session 2026, H0711.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 12, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1204A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1204A. ALTERNATIVE AUTHORIZATION PROGRAM -- ADMINISTRATORS. (1)
An individual who does not otherwise hold an administrator certificate
required for employment as a school principal or superintendent may sat-
isfy the standards of employment for such positions, or similar positions,
through the alternative authorization program, which is hereby established
to provide a nontraditional pathway to certification under an interim cer-
tificate. The alternative authorization program permits a school district
board of trustees to request issuance of a three (3) year interim certificate
for a qualified candidate. The program shall include two (2) pathways for
authorization:
(a) A "grow your own" pathway for experienced Idaho educators requiring
leadership development; and
(b) An "executive leadership" pathway for individuals transitioning
from business, military, government, nonprofit, or other sectors who
possess leadership and management expertise and require preparation in
education systems.
(2) To be eligible for alternative authorization as provided in this
section, an applicant shall:
(a) Pass a criminal history check as provided in section 33-130, Idaho
Code;
(b) Hold, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree or its equivalent from a re-
gionally or nationally accredited college or university;
(c) Submit a letter from the school district board of trustees affirm-
ing that the applicant demonstrates leadership knowledge and skills,
stating the district's intent to employ the applicant, and committing
to provide mentoring as required pursuant to subsection (5) of this sec-
tion; and
(d) Complete coursework consisting of no less than three (3) semester
credits in the statewide framework for teacher evaluations, including a
laboratory or applied component.


(3) An applicant who meets the eligibility requirements set forth in
subsection (2) of this section shall also satisfy one (1) of the following
experience pathways to be eligible for alternative authorization:
(a) The "grow your own" pathway, which requires no less than five (5)
years of certified teaching experience in one (1) or more Idaho public
schools; or
(b) The "executive leadership" pathway, which requires demonstrated
professional competency in management or leadership through no less
than five (5) years of experience in one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Higher education;
(ii) Government service;
(iii) Nonprofit organization service;
(iv) Private sector service;
(v) Military service at the officer level; or
(vi) Equivalent experience as determined by the state department
of education.
(4) Prior to the issuance of an interim certificate, the sponsoring
school district, in collaboration with the state department of education,
shall conduct an initial competency assessment using criteria aligned with
Idaho administrator standards as adopted by the state board of education to
identify any gaps in the applicant's knowledge or skills. If deficiencies
are identified, the applicant shall complete targeted coursework, profes-
sional development, or learning experiences consisting of no less than six
(6) semester credits or the equivalent. Such instruction may include but
is not limited to school law, public school finance, special education, and
instructional leadership.
(5)(a) An individual authorized for an interim certificate pursuant to
this section shall receive structured, embedded mentoring from a cer-
tified administrator throughout the three (3) year term of the interim
certificate. Such mentoring shall include:
(i) Assignment by the sponsoring school district, subject to cri-
teria established by the state department of education, of a men-
tor who holds an Idaho administrator certificate and has no less
than five (5) years of experience in a comparable administrative
role;
(ii) A minimum of seventy (70) clock hours of mentoring during
the first two (2) years aligned to a personalized learning plan
addressing areas identified for growth in the initial competency
assessment, including budgeting, student achievement analysis,
employee evaluation, strategic planning, conflict management,
school board relations, and special education law;
(iii) Ongoing evaluation and support throughout the interim cer-
tificate period; and
(iv) Submission of an annual mentoring summary by the mentor to
the state department of education that includes an assessment of
the individual's progress toward required competencies. The de-
partment shall review such summary for program oversight purposes
and provide feedback to the mentor regarding mentoring effective-
ness.


(b) The sponsoring school district shall compensate the mentor and may
use funds appropriated pursuant to section 33-320, Idaho Code, for this
purpose.
(6) An individual authorized for interim certification pursuant to
this section shall be subject to oversight by the professional standards
commission as provided in section 33-1208, Idaho Code. The state board of
education may deny issuance of an interim certificate for any reason that
would constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of a certificate.
(7) An interim certificate issued pursuant to this section may be re-
newed annually for a period not to exceed three (3) years, contingent on re-
ceipt of proficient performance evaluations from the school district board
of trustees and satisfactory completion of the mentoring requirements set
forth in subsection (5) of this section. Upon completion, the individual
shall be eligible for issuance of a standard administrator certificate with
principal or superintendent endorsements.
(8) An individual who successfully completes the alternative autho-
rization program and is issued a standard administrator certificate shall
remain subject to ongoing review, including annual professional development
requirements aligned with state standards.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-320. CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT PLANS AND TRAINING. (1) Each school
district and public charter school in Idaho shall develop an annual plan
that is part of a continuous focus on improving the student performance of
the district or public charter school. A public charter school may use its
performance certificate in lieu of a separate continuous improvement plan.
(2)(a) The board of trustees and the superintendent shall collaborate
on the plan and engage students, parents, educators, and the community
as appropriate. The board of directors and the administrator of a pub-
lic charter school shall collaborate on the plan and engage students,
parents, educators, and the community as appropriate. All continuous
improvement plans must be approved by the local governing board.
(b) The annual continuous improvement plan shall:
(i) Be data-driven, specifically in student outcomes, and shall
include, but not be limited to, analyses of demographic data, stu-
dent achievement and growth data, graduation rates, and college
and career readiness;
(ii) Set clear and measurable targets based on student outcomes;
(iii) Include a clearly developed and articulated vision and mis-
sion;
(iv) Include key indicators for monitoring performance;
(v) Include student literacy proficiency goals and targets and
how progress toward those outcomes will be measured;
(vi) Include, as applicable to the grade ranges served, trajec-
tory growth targets toward literacy proficiency;
(vii) Include, as applicable to the grade ranges served, college
and career advising and mentoring goals and how progress toward
those outcomes will be measured;


(viii) Include the individual staff performance on each of the
performance criteria as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code,
including measurable student achievement and student success
indicator targets and the percentage of students meeting those
targets. Data will be aggregated at the grade range, subject, or
performance indicator, as determined by the commission and al-
lowed pursuant to section 33-133, Idaho Code;
(ix) Include, at a minimum, the student achievement and growth
metrics for the state accountability framework. Student achieve-
ment and growth will be reported on each school and district's re-
port card as required by the state board of education and published
by the state department of education; and
(x) Include a report of progress toward the previous year's im-
provement goals.
(c) The annual continuous improvement plan must be reviewed and updated
annually no later than October 1 of each year.
(d) The board of trustees or the board of directors shall continuously
monitor progress toward the goals by utilizing relevant data to measure
growth. The progress shall be included in evaluations of the district
superintendent or administrator of a public charter school.
(3) The plan must be made available to the public and shall be posted on
the school district or charter school website.
(4) Of the moneys appropriated in the public schools educational sup-
port program, up to six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) shall be
distributed to each school district and public charter school to be expended
for training purposes for district superintendents and boards of trustees,
public charter school administrators, and boards of directors. Funds shall
be distributed on a reimbursement basis based on a process prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Qualified training shall include
training for continuous improvement processes and planning, strategic plan-
ning, finance, superintendent evaluations, public charter administrator
evaluations, ethics, and governance.
(5) Funds appropriated pursuant to this section may be used to support
administrator mentoring programs, including mentoring provided in section
33-1204A, Idaho Code.
(5) (6) The state board of education shall be granted rulemaking
authority to establish appropriate procedures, qualifications, and guide-
lines for qualified training providers and shall prepare a list of qualified
training providers within the state of Idaho.
(6) (7)(a) There is hereby established in the office of the state board
of education a state commission for education excellence, the purpose
of which will be to study and discuss continuous improvement plans es-
tablished pursuant to this section and measurable student achievement
and student success indicators described in section 33-1001, Idaho
Code, that have been submitted to the state. The members of the commis-
sion shall include:
(i) One (1) representative of the state board of education, ap-
pointed by such board;
(ii) One (1) representative of the state department of education,
appointed by such department;


(iii) One (1) representative of the office of the governor, ap-
pointed by the governor;
(iv) One (1) representative of business and industry, appointed
by the division of career technical education;
(v) Two (2) members of the majority caucus and one (1) member of
the minority caucus in the senate, appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate;
(vi) Two (2) members of the majority caucus and one (1) member of
the minority caucus in the house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives;
(vii) One (1) parent of a public school student, appointed by the
governor;
(viii) One (1) person who has been recognized as the Idaho teacher
of the year, appointed by the governor;
(ix) One (1) representative of the Idaho school boards associa-
tion, appointed by such association; and
(x) One (1) representative of the Idaho association of school ad-
ministrators, appointed by such association.
(b) The commission shall be staffed by the office of the state board of
education. Additional staff support from the legislative services of-
fice may be provided as needed.
(c) It is the intent of the legislature that the state commission for
education excellence analyze the measurable student achievement data
and continuous improvement plans in the various districts and pub-
lic charter schools in Idaho and then discuss and consider changes in
statute or rule that could enhance outcomes. The commission shall de-
termine some high-performing schools and districts, work to leverage
their best practices to the rest of the state, and listen to ideas re-
garding defining and celebrating successes in student achievement. The
commission shall meet at least twice annually. One (1) meeting shall
be held in the fall for the purpose of studying and discussing the con-
tinuous improvement plans' performance measures and benchmarks, and
one (1) meeting shall be held in the summer, after data for the prior
academic year have been compiled and submitted to the commission, to
review reports on statewide student success indicator achievement met-
rics submitted to the commission by the state department of education
and to discuss possible ways to improve desired student outcomes. All
such data and related statewide reports shall also be provided to all
legislators in Idaho not serving on the commission. A school district's
or public charter school's continuous improvement plan shall show how
the measurable student achievement and student success indicator tar-
gets are aligned with the continuous improvement plan described in this
section. The continuous improvement plan shall be submitted to the
state board of education or the board's designee no later than October
1 of each year.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.